Washington statutes.
RCW 26.40.070

Petition by parent for rescission, change in co-custodians, determination of parental responsibility.

The parents or parent upon whose petition an order for the commitment of a child to custody has been issued may, before such commitment becomes effective, petition the court for a rescission of the order or for a change in the co-custodians other than the state, or to determine that they are unable to continue parental responsibilities for the child, and the court shall proceed on such petition as on the original petition.

[ 1955 c 272 s 7.]